Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-2245
Older Americans Act, defined.

Older Americans Act means the federal Older Americans Act, as amended.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 9;

Laws 2018, LB903, § 8.
April 12, 2018